liblouis/share/liblouis/tables/en-us-g1.ctb
# liblouis: English, U.S. grade 1 (EBAE) table
#
#  Based on the Linux screenreader BRLTTY, copyright (C) 1999-2006 by
#  The BRLTTY Team
#
#  Copyright (C) 2004, 2005, 2006
#  ViewPlus Technologies, Inc. www.viewplus.com
#  and
#  JJB Software, Inc. www.jjb-software.com
#  All rights reserved
#
#  This file is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#   under the terms of the Lesser or Library GNU General Public License 
#  as published by the
#  Free Software Foundation; either version 3, or (at your option) any
#  later version.
# 
#  This file is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the 
#  Library GNU General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the Library GNU General Public 
#  License along with this program; see the file COPYING.  If not, write 
#  to
#  the Free Software Foundation, 51 Franklin Street, Fifth Floor,
#  Boston, MA 02110-1301, USA.
#
#  Maintained by John J. Boyer john.boyer@jjb-software.com

include chardefs.cti All character definition opcodes

# Braille indicators
numsign 3456  number sign, just a dots operand
capsign 6
begcaps 6-6
endcaps 6-3
firstwordital 46-46
lastworditalbefore 46
lenitalphrase 4
firstletterital 46-3
lastletterital 46-36
singleletterital 46-25
firstwordbold 456-456
lastwordboldbefore 456
lenboldphrase 4
begcomp 456-346
endcomp 456-156

# literary forms of the decimal digits
litdigit 1 1
litdigit 2 12
litdigit 3 14
litdigit 4 145
litdigit 5 15
litdigit 6 124
litdigit 7 1245
litdigit 8 125
litdigit 9 24
litdigit 0 245

# Letters are defined in chardefs.cti

# punctuation
prepunc ( 2356
word ( 4-2356
always ( 2356
postpunc ) 2356
word ) 4-2356
always ) 2356
prepunc " 236
postpunc " 356
word " 4-236
prepunc ` 6-236
prepunc ' 6-236
postpunc ' 356-3
word ' 4-3
word 'em = 
word 'tis =
word 'twas =
begnum # 456-1456 print number sign before number
midnum , 2
postpunc , 2
word , 4-2
decpoint . 46
midnum - 36
hyphen - 36
always \s--\s 36-36
always \s-\s 36-36
midnum \x00ad 36
postpunc . 256
word . 4-256
postpunc ; 23
word ; 4-23
midnum : 25
postpunc : 25
always : 4-25
postpunc ! 235
always ! 4-235
midnum / 34
always / 456-34
always < 5-13
always = 46-13
always > 46-2
always + 4-346
postpunc ? 236
word ? 4-236
endnum st 34
endnum nd 1345-145
endnum rd 1235-145
endnum 's 3-234
endnum th 1456
endnum 's 3-234
always % 4-25-1234
midnum ^ 45
always ^ 456-126
always ~ 4-156
always & 4-12346
midnum * 4-16
always * 35-35
prepunc [ 6-2356
word [ 4-6-2356
always [ 6-2356
postpunc ] 2356-3
word ] 4-2356-3
always ] 2356-3
prepunc { 56-2356
word { 4-56-2356
always { 56-2356
postpunc } 2356-23
word } 4-2356-23
always } 2356-23
always @ 4-1
always \\ 4-1256
always | 456-1256
repeated \s 0
repeated \t 0
always \s-\s 36-36
always ..." 3-3-3-356
always ... 3-3-3
always ...' 3-3-3-356-3
repeated .... 0
repeated ____ 456
repeated ---- 36
always .\s.\s." 3-3-3-356
always .\s.\s. 3-3-3 . . .
begnum $ 256
always $ 4-256

# special character sequences
compbrl :// URLs
compbrl ()
compbrl www.
compbrl ::
compbrl .com
compbrl .edu
compbrl .gov
compbrl .ini
compbrl .mil
compbrl .net
compbrl .org
compbrl .doc
compbrl .xml
compbrl .xsl
compbrl .htm
compbrl .html
compbrl .tex
compbrl .txt
compbrl .gif
compbrl .jpg
compbrl .png
compbrl .wav
compbrl .tar
compbrl .zip

context "\e"$a *
always \\_ 56 letter sign before Roman page numbers
pass2 @56-56 @56
